Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-733
Diplomas of high school equivalency; acceptance by colleges.

Diplomas of high school equivalency issued pursuant to section 79-730 shall be accepted by the University of Nebraska, the community colleges, and the state colleges for enrollment purposes.

Laws 1969, c. 721, § 5, p. 2751;

Laws 1975, LB 449, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,147.04;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 407.